apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="w/ind__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>inding</l>              <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inded</l>               <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ound</l>                <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inded</l>               <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ound</l>                <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ind</l>                 <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inds</l>                <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hosan/a__n">
<e>                           <p><l>as</l>                  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>nas</l>                 <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>na</l>                  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sweat__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/all__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>alling</l>              <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ell</l>                 <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>allen</l>               <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>all</l>                 <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>alls</l>                <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/oot__n">
<e>                           <p><l>eet</l>                 <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oot</l>                 <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gruel/ling__adj">
<e r="LR">                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ling<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ling</l>                 <r>ling<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hepatiti/s__n">
<e>                           <p><l>des</l>                 <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="up__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ping</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ped</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ped</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/it__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>itting</l>              <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>at</l>                  <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>at</l>                  <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>it</l>                  <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>its</l>                 <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sob__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>bing</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>bed</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>bed</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hono/urs__n">
<e>                           <p><l>rs</l>                  <r>urs<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/eak__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eaking</l>              <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oke</l>                 <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oken</l>                <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eak</l>                 <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaks</l>                <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="unsavo/ury__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>ry</l>                  <r>ury<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fuel__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ling</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>led</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>led</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="read__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="medal/list__n">
<e r="LR">                           <p><l>ists</l>                <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                           <p><l>ist</l>                 <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>lists</l>                <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>list</l>                 <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="arthritis">            <i>arthriti</i><par n="hepatiti/s__n"/></e>
<e lm="backpedal">            <i>backpedal</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="barrel">               <i>barrel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="channel">              <i>channel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chisel">               <i>chisel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fuel">                 <i>fuel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gruelling">            <i>gruel</i><par n="gruel/ling__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impel">                <i>impel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="initial">              <i>initial</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marvel">               <i>marvel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medallist">            <i>medal</i><par n="medal/list__n"/></e>
<e lm="parallel">             <i>parallel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reinstall">            <i>reinstall</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stab">                 <i>stab</i><par n="sob__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="total">                <i>total</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unravel">              <i>unravel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="up">                   <i>up</i><par n="up__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="break">                <i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fall down">            <i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="foot">                 <i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
<e lm="fall">                 <i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speak">                <i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spread">               <i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sit">                  <i>s</i><par n="s/it__vblex"/></e>
